Nebraska, session 109, LB850.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB850 LB850
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 18-2705, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2705 (1) Economic development program means any project or
program utilizing funds derived from local sources of revenue for the
purpose of providing direct or indirect financial assistance to a
qualifying business or the payment of related costs and expenses or both,
without regard to whether that business is identified at the time the
project or program is initiated or is to be determined by specified means
at some time in the future.
(2) An economic development program may include, but shall not be
limited to: (a) Direct loans or grants to qualifying businesses for fixed
assets or working capital or both, (b) loan guarantees for qualifying
businesses, (c) grants for public works improvements which are essential
to the location or expansion of, or the provision of new services by, a
qualifying business, (d) grants or loans to qualifying businesses for job
training, (e) the purchase of real estate, options for such purchases,
and the renewal or extension of such options, (f) grants or loans to
qualifying businesses to provide relocation incentives for new residents,
(g) the issuance of bonds as provided for in the Local Option Municipal
Economic Development Act, and (h) payments for salaries and support of
city staff to implement the economic development program or develop an
affordable housing action plan, including any such plan required under
section 19-5505, or payments for the contracting of such program
implementation or plan development to an outside entity.
(3) An For cities of the first class, cities of the second class,
and villages, an economic development program may also include grants,
loans, or funds for construction or rehabilitation for sale or lease of
housing (a) for persons of low or moderate income, (b) as part of a
workforce housing plan, or (c) as part of an affordable housing action
plan, including any such plan required under section 19-5505. :
(a) Construction or rehabilitation for sale or lease of housing (i)
-2-

LB850 LB850
2026 2026
for persons of low or moderate income, (ii) as part of a workforce
housing plan, or (iii) as part of an affordable housing action plan,
including any such plan required under section 19-5505;
(4) For cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and
villages, an economic development program may also include grants, loans,
or funds for:
(a) (b) Rural infrastructure development as defined in section
66-2102; or
(b) (c) Early childhood infrastructure development.
(5) (4) An economic development program may be conducted jointly by
two or more cities after the approval of the program by the voters of
each participating city.
Sec. 2. Section 18-2709, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
18-2709 (1) Qualifying business means any corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, or sole proprietorship which derives its
principal source of income from any of the following: The manufacture of
articles of commerce; the conduct of research and development; the
processing, storage, transport, or sale of goods or commodities which are
sold or traded in interstate commerce; the sale of services in interstate
commerce; headquarters facilities relating to eligible activities as
listed in this section; telecommunications activities, including services
providing advanced telecommunications capability; tourism-related
activities; or the production of films, including feature, independent,
and documentary films, commercials, and television programs.
(2) Qualifying business also means:
(a) A In cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and
villages, a business that derives its principal source of income from the
construction or rehabilitation of housing;
(b) In cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and
villages, a business that derives its principal source of income from
-3-

LB850 LB850
2026 2026
early childhood care and education programs;
(c) A business that derives its principal source of income from
retail trade. For purposes of this subdivision, retail trade means a
business which is principally engaged in the sale of goods or commodities
to ultimate consumers for their own use or consumption and not for
resale; and
(d) In cities with a population of five thousand inhabitants or less
as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most
recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census,
a business shall be a qualifying business even though it derives its
principal source of income from activities other than those set out in
this section.
(3) If a business which would otherwise be a qualifying business
employs people and carries on activities in more than one city in
Nebraska or will do so at any time during the first year following its
application for participation in an economic development program, it
shall be a qualifying business only if, in each such city, it maintains
employment for the first two years following the date on which such
business begins operations in the city as a participant in its economic
development program at a level not less than its average employment in
such city over the twelve-month period preceding participation.
(4) A qualifying business need not be located within the territorial
boundaries of the city from which it is or will be receiving financial
assistance.
(5) Qualifying business does not include a political subdivision, a
state agency, or any other governmental entity, except as allowed for
cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and villages for
rural infrastructure development as provided for in subdivision (4)(a)
(3)(b) of section 18-2705.
Sec. 3. Original section 18-2705, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 18-2709, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
-4-

LB850 LB850
2026 2026
repealed.
-5-